Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-2905
Act; how construed.

The Veteran Promise Act shall be construed in a manner consistent with federal law, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Defense Tuition Assistance Program and with any Voluntary Education Partnership Memorandum of Understanding entered into by a public postsecondary institution and the United States Department of Defense.

Laws 2021, LB669, § 5.